Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. Initiative.

Collateral references. —

42 Am. Jur. 2d, Initiative and Referendum, § 1 et seq.

82 C.J.S., Statutes, §§ 108-144.

Right of signer of petition or remonstrance to withdraw therefrom or revoke withdrawal, and time therefor. 27 ALR2d 604.

Sec. 15.45.010.
Provision and scope for use of the initiative.

The law-making powers assigned to the legislature may be exercised by the people through the initiative. However, an initiative may not be proposed to dedicate revenue, to make or repeal appropriations, to create courts, to define the jurisdiction of courts or prescribe their rules, or to enact local or special legislation.

History.

(§ 9.01 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.020.
Filing application.

An initiative is proposed by filing an application with the lieutenant governor. A deposit of $100 must accompany the application.
This deposit shall be retained if a petition is not properly filed.
If a petition is properly filed, the deposit shall be refunded.

History.

(§ 9.02 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 22 ch 125 SLA 1962)

Sec. 15.45.030.
Form of application.

The application must include the

proposed bill;

printed name, the signature, the address, and a numerical identifier of not fewer than 100 qualified voters who will serve as sponsors; each signature page must include a statement that the sponsors are qualified voters who signed the application with the proposed bill attached; and

designation of an initiative committee consisting of three of the sponsors who subscribed to the application and represent all sponsors and subscribers in matters relating to the initiative; the designation must include the name, mailing address, and signature of each committee member.

History.

(§ 9.03 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 31 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.040.
Form of proposed bill.

The proposed bill shall be in the following form:

the bill shall be confined to one subject;

the subject of the bill shall be expressed in the title;

the enacting clause of the bill shall be: “Be it enacted by the People of the State of Alaska;”

the bill may not include subjects restricted by AS

15.45.010

.

History.

(§ 9.04 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.050.
Manner of notice.

Notice to the initiative committee on any matter pertaining to the application and petition may be served on any member of the committee in person or by mail addressed to a committee member as indicated on the application.

History.

(§ 9.05 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.060.
Designation of sponsors.

The qualified voters who subscribe to the application in support of the proposed bill are designated as sponsors. The initiative committee may designate additional sponsors by giving written notice to the lieutenant governor of the names, addresses, and numerical identifiers of those so designated.

History.

(§ 9.06 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 32 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.070.
Review of application for certification.

Within 60 calendar days after the date the application is received, the lieutenant governor shall review the application and shall either certify it or notify the initiative committee of the grounds for denial.

History.

(§ 9.07 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 2006)

Sec. 15.45.080.
Bases of denial of certification.

The lieutenant governor shall deny certification upon determining in writing that

the proposed bill to be initiated is not confined to one subject or is otherwise not in the required form;

the application is not substantially in the required form; or

there is an insufficient number of qualified sponsors.

History.

(§ 9.08 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 73 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of the provisions of this section apply “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Sec. 15.45.090.
Preparation of petition.

If the application is certified, the lieutenant governor shall prepare a sufficient number of sequentially numbered petitions to allow full circulation throughout the state. Each petition must contain

a copy of the proposed bill;

an impartial summary of the subject matter of the bill;

a statement of minimum costs to the state associated with certification of the initiative application and review of the initiative petition, excluding legal costs to the state and the costs to the state of any challenge to the validity of the petition;

an estimate of the cost to the state of implementing the proposed law;

the statement of warning prescribed in AS

15.45.100

;

sufficient space for the printed name, a numerical identifier, the signature, the date of signature, and the address of each person signing the petition; and

other specifications prescribed by the lieutenant governor to ensure proper handling and control.

Upon request of the initiative committee, the lieutenant governor shall report to the committee the number of persons who voted in the preceding general election.

History.

(§ 9.09 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1998; am § 33 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am § 11 ch 73 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of the provisions of (a) of this section apply “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Sec. 15.45.100.
Statement of warning.

Each petition shall include a statement of warning that a person who signs a name other than the person’s own on the petition, or who knowingly signs more than once for the same proposition at one election, or who signs the petition when knowingly not a qualified voter, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 9.10 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 173 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 15.45.105.
Qualifications of circulator.

To circulate a petition booklet, a person shall be

a citizen of the United States;

18 years of age or older; and

a resident of the state as determined under AS

15.05.020

.

History.

(§ 34 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.110.
Circulation of petition; prohibitions and penalty.

The petitions may be circulated throughout the state only in person.

[Repealed, § 92 ch 82 SLA 2000.]

A circulator may not receive payment or agree to receive payment that is greater than $1 a signature, and a person or an organization may not pay or agree to pay an amount that is greater than $1 a signature, for the collection of signatures on a petition.

A person or organization may not knowingly pay, offer to pay, or cause to be paid money or other valuable thing to a person to sign or refrain from signing a petition.

A person or organization that violates (c) or (d) of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

In this section,

“organization” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“other valuable thing” has the meaning given in AS

15.56.030(d)

;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 9.11 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 1998; am §§ 63 — 65, 92 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 15.45.120.
Manner of signing and withdrawing name from petition.

Any qualified voter may subscribe to the petition by printing the voter’s name, a numerical identifier, and an address, by signing the voter’s name, and by dating the signature. A person who has signed the initiative petition may withdraw the person’s name only by giving written notice to the lieutenant governor before the date the petition is filed.

History.

(§ 9.12 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 35 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.130.
Certification of circulator.

Before being filed, each petition shall be certified by an affidavit by the person who personally circulated the petition. In determining the sufficiency of the petition, the lieutenant governor may not count subscriptions on petitions not properly certified at the time of filing or corrected before the subscriptions are counted. The affidavit must state in substance

that the person signing the affidavit meets the residency, age, and citizenship qualifications for circulating a petition under AS

15.45.105

;

that the person is the only circulator of that petition;

that the signatures were made in the circulator’s actual presence;

that, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the signatures are the signatures of the persons whose names they purport to be;

that, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the signatures are of persons who were qualified voters on the date of signature;

that the circulator has not entered into an agreement with a person or organization in violation of AS

15.45.110(c)

;

that the circulator has not violated AS

15.45.110(d)

with respect to that petition; and

whether the circulator has received payment or agreed to receive payment for the collection of signatures on the petition, and, if so, the name of each person or organization that has paid or agreed to pay the circulator for collection of signatures on the petition.

History.

(§ 9.13 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 1998; am § 66 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 36 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For applicability provisions relating to the 1998 amendments to this section, see § 8(c), ch. 80, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 15.45.140.
Filing of petition.

The sponsors must file the initiative petition within one year from the time the sponsors received notice from the lieutenant governor that the petitions were ready for delivery to them. The petition may be filed with the lieutenant governor only if it meets all of the following requirements: it is signed by qualified voters

equal in number to 10 percent of those who voted in the preceding general election;

resident in at least three-fourths of the house districts of the state; and

who, in each of the house districts described in (2) of this subsection, are equal in number to at least seven percent of those who voted in the preceding general election in the house district.

If the petition is not filed within the one-year period provided for in (a) of this section, the petition has no force or effect.

History.

(§ 9.14 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1971; am § 55 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 148 SLA 2004)

Opinions of attorney general. —

An initiative petition must be sufficient on its face before it may be accepted for filing, i.e., it must have the requisite number of purportedly valid signatures before it may be filed in the office of the attorney general; a petition deficient in this respect should be returned to the sponsors. February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

An initiative petition which, on its face, is seen to contain an insufficient number of signatures may not be filed and later supplemented to cure the deficiency.
February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Former AS

15.45.170

authorized a supplementary petition, but that privilege is afforded only when a petition, believed to contain a sufficient number of signatures of qualified voters, is later found to contain signatures of persons who are not qualified voters; in such a case, the latent defect of numbers may be cured, but where the defect is patent, the petition may not be accepted for filing.
February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 15.45.150.
Review of petition.

Within not more than 60 days of the date the petition was filed, the lieutenant governor shall review the petition and shall notify the initiative committee whether the petition was properly or improperly filed, and at which election the proposition shall be placed on the ballot.

History.

(§ 9.15 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.160.
Bases for determining the petition was improperly filed.

The lieutenant governor shall notify the committee that the petition was improperly filed upon determining that

there is an insufficient number of qualified subscribers;

the subscribers were not resident in at least three-fourths of the house districts of the state; or

there is an insufficient number of qualified subscribers from each of the house districts described in (2) of this section.

History.

(§ 9.16 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 56 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 22 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Sec. 15.45.170.
Submission of supplementary petition. [Repealed, § 7 ch 80 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 15.45.180.
Preparation of ballot title and proposition.

If the petition is properly filed, the lieutenant governor, with the assistance of the attorney general, shall prepare a ballot title and proposition. The ballot title shall, in not more than 25 words, indicate the general subject of the proposition. The proposition shall give a true and impartial summary of the proposed law. The total number of words used in the summary may not exceed the product of the number of sections in the proposed law multiplied by 50. In this subsection, “section” means a provision of the proposed law that is distinct from other provisions in purpose or subject matter.

The proposition prepared under (a) of this section shall comply with AS

15.80.005

and shall be worded so that a “Yes” vote on the proposition is a vote to enact the proposed law.

History.

(§ 9.18 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (b), “AS

15.80.005

” was substituted for “AS

15.60.005

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

15.60.005

.

Sec. 15.45.190.
Placing proposition on ballot.

The lieutenant governor shall direct the director to place the ballot title and proposition on the election ballot of the first statewide general, special, special primary, or primary election that is held after

the petition has been filed;

a legislative session has convened and adjourned; and

a period of 120 days has expired since the adjournment of the legislative session.

History.

(§ 9.19 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 35 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 174 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 1998; am § 36 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 61, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to this section, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in the introductory language, inserted “special runoff,” near the end.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in the introductory language, substituted “special primary” for “special runoff” near the end.

Editor's notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this act are independent and severable. If any provision of this act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

An initiative petition must be filed before the start of the legislative session in order to be presented to the electorate at the first statewide election held 120 or more days after the conclusion of that session. February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 15.45.195.
Public hearings.

At least 30 days before the election at which an initiative is to appear on the ballot, the lieutenant governor or a designee of the lieutenant governor shall hold two or more public hearings concerning the initiative in each judicial district of the state. Each public hearing under this section shall include the written or oral testimony of one supporter and one opponent of the initiative.

The lieutenant governor shall provide reasonable notice of each public hearing required under this section. The notice must include the date, time, and place of the hearing. The notice may be given using print or broadcast media. The lieutenant governor shall provide notice in a consistent fashion for all hearings required under this section.

Penalties for a violation of this section may not include removal of an initiative from the ballot.

If the lieutenant governor determines that it is technologically and economically feasible, the division shall provide a live audio and video broadcast of each hearing held under (a) of this section on the division’s Internet website.

History.

(§ 12 ch 73 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73, SLA 2010, this section applies “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Sec. 15.45.200.
Display of proposed law.

The director shall provide each election board with at least five copies of the proposed law being initiated, and the election board shall display at least one copy of the proposed law in a conspicuous place in the room where the election is held.

History.

(§ 9.20 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 175 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 37 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.210.
Determination of void petition.

If the lieutenant governor, with the formal concurrence of the attorney general, determines that an act of the legislature that is substantially the same as the proposed law was enacted after the petition had been filed, and before the date of the election, the petition is void and the lieutenant governor shall so notify the committee.

History.

(§ 9.21 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Opinions of attorney general. —

An initiative petition, known as 17 AKGA, was certified by the Lieutenant Governor to appear on the November 2018 ballot; it related broadly to campaign finance, public official integrity, and good governance. During the legislative session the legislature enacted HB 44 (Chapter 61, SLA 2018), similarly relating, inter alia, to campaign expenditures and contributions, the legislators’ per diem, gifts by lobbyists, and voting or other actions by a legislator where the legislator had a conflict of interest. Under AS

15.45.210

, where an act of the legislature is substantially the same as a petition, is enacted after the petition has been filed and before the date of the election, the petition is void. Following the passage of HB 44, the Lieutenant Governor determined, and the Attorney General agreed, that the initiative petition known as 17 AKGA, and HB 44, were substantially the same, rendering 17 AKGA void and ineligible to appear on the ballot. 2018 Op. Alaska Att’y Gen. (May 25).

Sec. 15.45.220.
Adoption and effective date of proposed law.

If a majority of the votes cast on the initiative proposition favor its adoption, the proposed law is enacted, and the lieutenant governor shall so certify. The act becomes effective 90 days after certification.

History.

(§ 9.22 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.230.
Insufficiency of application or petition. [Repealed, § 7, ch 80 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 15.45.240.
Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a determination made by the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.010

—

15.45.220

may bring an action in the superior court to have the determination reviewed within 30 days of the date on which notice of the determination was given.

History.

(§ 9.24 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 176 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 80 SLA 1998)

Sec. 15.45.245.
Delegation by lieutenant governor.

The lieutenant governor may delegate the duties imposed on the lieutenant governor by AS

15.45.010

—

15.45.240

to the director.

History.

(§ 177 ch 100 SLA 1980)